Florida, session 2026, HB397.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb397 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 397 2026 Legislature

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Victim Safety in
Pretrial Release Act."
Section 2. Section 903.0472, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
903.0472 Violations of pretrial release for specified
crimes.—
(1) A person commits a misdemeanor of the first degree,
punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, if he or she
willfully violates a condition of pretrial release described in
s. 903.047(1)(b) which a court imposed after he or she was
arrested for committing any of the following offenses:
(a) Murder, as defined in s. 782.04;
(b) Manslaughter, as defined in s. 782.07;
(c) Assault, as defined in s. 784.011;
(d) Aggravated assault, as defined in s. 784.021;
(e) Battery, as defined in s. 784.03;
(f) Aggravated battery, as defined in s. 784.045;
(g) Stalking, as defined in s. 784.048(2);
(h) Aggravated stalking, as defined in s. 784.048(3), (4),
(5), or (7);
(i) Kidnapping, as defined in s. 787.01;
(j) False imprisonment, as defined in s. 787.02;
(k) Sexual battery, as defined in s. 794.011;
(l) Lewd or lascivious offenses committed upon or in the
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb397 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 397 2026 Legislature
presence of persons less than 16 years of age, as described in
s. 800.04;
(m) Robbery, as defined in s. 812.13;
(n) Written or electronic threats to kill or do bodily
injury, as described in s. 836.10; or
(o) Any other felony that involves the use or threat of
physical force or violence against any individual.
(2) A person commits a felony of the third degree,
punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084,
if he or she commits a second or subsequent violation of
subsection (1).
(3) A person who is arrested for a violation of this
section or who is on pretrial release for committing an offense
specified in subsection (1) and who is arrested for committing a
new law violation shall be held in custody until his or her
first appearance hearing, at which time the court shall review
the alleged violation and determine whether to order pretrial
detention or to grant pretrial release with appropriate
conditions. In making such determinations, the court shall
prioritize the safety of the victim and the public and, in
addition to the criteria in s. 903.046(2), shall also consider:
(a) The nature and severity of the underlying offense for
which conditions of pretrial release were imposed.
(b) The person's history of compliance with court orders.
(c) Any evidence of the person's intent to intimidate,
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb397 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 397 2026 Legislature
harass, or harm any person.
(4) A law enforcement officer may not be held liable in
any civil action for an arrest of a person based on probable
cause to believe that the person has violated this section.
Section 3. Subsection (17) is added to section 901.15,
Florida Statutes, to read:
901.15 When arrest by officer without warrant is lawful.—A
law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant
when:
(17) There is probable cause to believe that the person
has committed a violation of s. 903.0472(1), for willfully
violating a condition of pretrial release for a specified crime.
Section 4. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb397 -02-er